Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3210
Act, how cited.

Sections 29-3201 to 29-3210 may be cited as the Uniform Rendition of Prisoners as Witnesses in Criminal Proceedings Act.

Laws 1969, c. 229, § 10, p. 856.